test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_AHL_STEM_1.yaml
# YAML file for Class CLASS_AHL_STEM_1 verbs

Config:
 hfst:
  Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
  Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
 xerox:
  Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
  Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
  App: lookup

Tests:

    # CLASS_AHL_STEM_1

     áljahl+V+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: áljahl
     áljahl+V+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: áljahl
     áljahl+V+RELATIVE: áljahls
     áljahl+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: áljahläsaa
     áljahl+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: áljahläs
     áljahl+V+SIMPLE+FUTURE: áljahläsaang
     áljahl+V+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: áljahläsga
     áljahl+V+RELATIVE+FUTURE: áljahläsaas
     áljahl+V+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: áljahläsaa.ang
     áljahl+V+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: áljahl'uuj
     áljahl+V+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: áljahl'uujang
     áljahl+V+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: áljahläsaa'uujang
     áljahl+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: áljahl'us
     áljahl+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: áljahl'ujaa
     áljahl+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: áljahl'uujaangaa
     áljahl+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: áljahläsaa'us
     áljahl+V+CERTAIN+FUTURE: áljahläsaa'ahlans
     áljahl+V+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: áljahläseehl
     áljahl+V+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: áljahl'uu
     áljahl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: áljahl'waa
     áljahl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: áljahl'waa
     áljahl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: áljahl'waang
     áljahl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: áljahl'wägan
     áljahl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: áljahl'aawaa
     áljahl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: áljahl'aawaan
     áljahl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: áljahl'waas
     áljahl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: áljahl'aawaas
     áljahl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: áljahl'waa.ang
     áljahl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: áljahl'aawaa.ang
     áljahl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: áljahl'wägiinii
     áljahl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: áljahl'wägaangaa
     áljahl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: áljahl'wägaangaan
     áljahl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: áljahl'waaäsaa
     áljahl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: áljahl'waaäs
     áljahl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: áljahl'waaäsaang
     áljahl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: áljahl'waaäsga
     áljahl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: áljahl'waaäsaas
     áljahl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: áljahl'waaäsaa.ang
     áljahl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: áljahl'waa.ang ñasa'áa
     áljahl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: áljahl'waa.ang ñasa'áang
     áljahl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: áljahl'waa.ang ñasaasdláa
     áljahl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: áljahl'waa.ang ñasaasdláang
     áljahl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: áljahl'waa'uuj
     áljahl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: áljahl'waa'uujang
     áljahl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: áljahl'waaäsaa'uujang
     áljahl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: áljahl'waa'us
     áljahl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: áljahl'waa'ujaa
     áljahl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: áljahl'waa'uujaangaa
     áljahl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: áljahl'waaäsaa'us
     áljahl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: áljahl'waa'ahlanggang
     áljahl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: áljahl'waa'ahlanggan
     áljahl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: áljahl'waa'ahlanggiinii
     áljahl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: áljahl'waaäsaa'ahlans
     áljahl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: áljahl'waa'ahlans
     áljahl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: áljahl'aawaa'ahlang
     áljahl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: áljahl'aawaa'ahlanggaa
     áljahl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: áljahl'aawaa'ahlanggang
     áljahl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE: áljahl'waa'ahl
     áljahl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: áljahl'waaäseehl
     áljahl+V+NEGATIVE+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: áljahl'ang
     áljahl+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: áljahl'angga
     áljahl+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: áljahl'ang
     áljahl+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: áljahl'anggang
     áljahl+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST: áljahl'anggan
     áljahl+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: áljahl'aangaa
     áljahl+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST: áljahl'aangaan
     áljahl+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE: áljahl'ans
     áljahl+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: áljahl'aangaas
     áljahl+V+NEGATIVE+NON_FACTIVE: áljahl'angang
     áljahl+V+NEGATIVE+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: áljahl'aangaa.ang
     áljahl+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: áljahl'anggang
     áljahl+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: áljahl'anggiinii
     áljahl+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: áljahl'anggaangaa
     áljahl+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: áljahl'anggaangaan
     áljahl+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: áljahl'angäsaa
     áljahl+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: áljahl'angäs
     áljahl+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+FUTURE: áljahl'angäsaang
     áljahl+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: áljahl'angäsga
     áljahl+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+FUTURE: áljahl'angäsaas
     áljahl+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: áljahl'angäsaa.ang
     áljahl+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: áljahl'ang'uuj
     áljahl+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: áljahl'ang'uujang
     áljahl+V+NEGATIVE+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: áljahl'angäsaa'uujang
     áljahl+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: áljahl'ang'us
     áljahl+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: áljahl'ang'ujaa
     áljahl+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: áljahl'ang'uujaangaa
     áljahl+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: áljahl'angäsaa'us
     áljahl+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PRESENT: áljahl'aang'ahlanggang
     áljahl+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST: áljahl'aang'ahlanggan
     áljahl+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: áljahl'aang'ahlanggiinii
     áljahl+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+FUTURE: áljahl'angäsaa'ahlans
     áljahl+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: áljahl'aang'ahlans
     áljahl+V+NEGATIVE+INTENSIVE+PAST: áljahl'aangaa'ahlang
     áljahl+V+NEGATIVE+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: áljahl'aangaa'ahlanggaa
     áljahl+V+NEGATIVE+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: áljahl'aangaa'ahlanggang
     áljahl+V+NEGATIVE+REFLEXIVE: áljahl'aang'ahl
     áljahl+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: áljahl'angäseehl
     áljahl+V+NEGATIVE+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: áljahl'ang'uu
     áljahl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: áljahl'ang'waa
     áljahl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: áljahl'ang'waa
     áljahl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: áljahl'ang'waang
     áljahl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: áljahl'ang'wägan
     áljahl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: áljahl'ang'aawaa
     áljahl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: áljahl'ang'aawaan
     áljahl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: áljahl'ang'waas
     áljahl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: áljahl'ang'aawaas
     áljahl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: áljahl'ang'waa.ang
     áljahl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: áljahl'ang'aawaa.ang
     áljahl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: áljahl'ang'wägiinii
     áljahl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: áljahl'ang'wägaangaa
     áljahl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: áljahl'ang'wägaangaan
     áljahl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: áljahl'ang'waaäsaa
     áljahl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: áljahl'ang'waaäs
     áljahl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: áljahl'ang'waaäsaang
     áljahl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: áljahl'ang'waaäsga
     áljahl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: áljahl'ang'waaäsaas
     áljahl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: áljahl'ang'waaäsaa.ang
     áljahl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: áljahl'waa.ang ñasaa'áng
     áljahl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: áljahl'waa.ang ñasaa'ánggang
     áljahl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: áljahl'waa.ang ñasaasdlä'áng
     áljahl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: áljahl'waa.ang ñasaasdlä'ánggang
     áljahl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: áljahl'ang'waa'uuj
     áljahl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: áljahl'ang'waa'uujang
     áljahl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: áljahl'ang'waaäsaa'uujang
     áljahl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: áljahl'ang'waa'us
     áljahl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: áljahl'ang'waa'ujaa
     áljahl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: áljahl'ang'waa'uujaangaa
     áljahl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: áljahl'ang'waaäsaa'us
     áljahl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: áljahl'ang'waa'ahlanggang
     áljahl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: áljahl'ang'waa'ahlanggan
     áljahl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: áljahl'ang'waa'ahlanggiinii
     áljahl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: áljahl'ang'waaäsaa'ahlans
     áljahl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: áljahl'ang'waa'ahlans
     áljahl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: áljahl'ang'aawaa'ahlang
     áljahl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: áljahl'ang'aawaa'ahlanggaa
     áljahl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: áljahl'ang'aawaa'ahlanggang
     áljahl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE: áljahl'ang'waa'ahl
     áljahl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: áljahl'ang'waaäseehl
